New Jersey, session 221, S2567.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Gross income shall not include a minimum required distribution from a qualified retirement plan as those terms are defined in section 4974 of the federal Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. s.4974). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning after enactment.